Utah, session 2026, HB45.
Section 1. Section 15A-5-103 is amended to read:15A-5-103. Nationally recognized codes incorporated by reference.The following codes are incorporated by reference into the State Fire Code:(1)the International Fire Code, 20212024 edition, excluding appendices, as issued by the International Code Council, Inc., except as amended by Part 2, Statewide Amendments and Additions to International Fire Code Incorporated as Part of State Fire Code;(2)National Fire Protection Association, NFPA 1, Chapter 38, Marijuana Growing, Processing, and Extraction Facilities, 20182024 edition;(3)National Fire Protection Association, NFPA 54, National Fuel Gas Code, 2024 edition; and(4)National Fire Protection Association, NFPA 58, Liquefied Petroleum Gas Code, 2024 edition.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 15A-5-202 is amended to read:15A-5-202. Amendments and additions to IFC related to administration, permits, definitions, and general and emergency planning.(1)For IFC, Chapter 1, Scope and Administration:(a)IFC, Chapter 1, Section 102.5, is deleted and rewritten as follows:"102.5 Application of residential code.If a structure is designed and constructed in accordance with the International Residential Code, the provisions of this code apply only as follows:1.  The construction and design provisions of this code apply only to premises identification, fire apparatus access, fire hydrants and water supplies, and construction permits required by Section 105.7.2.  This code does not supersede the land use, subdivision, or development standards established by a local jurisdiction.3.  The administrative, operational, and maintenance provisions of this code apply."(b)IFC, Chapter 1, Section 102.9, is deleted and rewritten as follows:"102.9  Matters not provided for.Requirements that are essential for the public safety of an existing or proposed activity, building or structure, or for the safety of the occupants thereof, which are not specifically provided for by this code, shall be determined by the fire code official on an emergency basis if:(a) the facts known to the fire code official show that an immediate and significant danger to the public health, safety, or welfare exists; and(b) the threat requires immediate action by the fire code official.102.9.1 Limitation of emergency order.In issuing its emergency order, the fire code official shall:(a) limit the order to require only the action necessary to prevent or avoid the danger to the public health, safety, or welfare; and(b) give immediate notice to the persons who are required to comply with the order, that includes a brief statement of the reasons for the fire code official's order.101.9.2 Right to appeal emergency order.If the emergency order issued under this section will result in the continued infringement or impairment of any legal right or interest of any party, the party shall have a right to appeal the fire code official's order in accordance with IFC, Chapter 1, Section 109."(c)IFC, Chapter 1, Section 106.1, Submittals, is amended to add the following after the last sentence:"Fire sprinkler system layout shall be prepared and submitted by a person certified by the National Institute for Certification in Engineering Technologies at level III or IV in Water-Based System Layout. Fire alarm system layout shall be prepared and submitted by a person certified by the National Institute for Certification in Engineering Technologies at level III or IV in Fire Alarm Systems."(d)IFC, Chapter 1, Section 105.5.18, Flammable and combustible liquids, is amended to add the following section:  "12. The owner of an underground tank that is out of service for longer than one year shall receive a Temporary Closure Notice from the Department of Environmental Quality and a copy shall be given to the AHJ."(e)In IFC, Chapter 1, Section 102.5, a new subsection 3., is added as follows:"3.  For development regulated by a local jurisdiction's land use authority, the fire code official's interpretation of this code is subject to the advisory opinion process described in Utah Code, Section 13-43-205, and to a land use appeal authority appointed under Utah Code, Section 10-20-1101 or 17-79-1001."(f)In IFC, Chapter 1, Section 111113, a new Section 111.5112.5, Notice of right to appeal, is added as follows: "At the time a fire code official makes an order, decision, or determination that relates to the application or interpretation of this chapter, the fire code official shall inform the person affected by the order, decision, or determination of the person's right to appeal under this section. Upon request, the fire code official shall provide a person affected by an order, decision, or determination that relates to the application or interpretation of this chapter a written notice that describes the person's right to appeal under this section."(2)For IFC, Chapter 2, Definitions:(a)In IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202, General Definitions, the following definition is added for Ambulatory Surgical Centerambulatory surgical center: "AMBULATORY SURGICAL CENTER. A building or portion of a building licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services where procedures are performed that may render patients incapable of self -preservation where care is less than 24 hours. See Utah Administrative Code, R432-13, Freestanding Ambulatory Surgical Center Construction Rule."(b)In IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202, General Definitions, "APPROVED" is modified by adding the words "or independent third-party licensed engineer or licensed architect and submitted to the fire code official" after the word "official."(c)In IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202, General Definitions, the following definition is added for Assisted Living Facility, Residential Treatment and Supportassisted living facility, residential treatment and support: "ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY, RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT AND SUPPORT. A residential facility that provides a group living environment for four or more residents licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services and provides a protected living arrangement for ambulatory, non-restrained persons who are capable of achieving mobility sufficient to exit the facility without the physical assistance of another person.ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY, TYPE I. A residential facility licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services that provides a protected living arrangement, assistance with activities of daily living and social care to two or more ambulatory, non-restrained persons who are capable of mobility sufficient to exit the facility without the assistance of another person.ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY, TYPE II. A residential facility licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services that provides an array of coordinated supportive personal and health care services to two or more residents who are:A. Physically disabled but able to direct his or her own care; orB. Cognitively impaired or physically disabled but able to evacuate from the facility, or to a zone or area of safety, with the physical assistance of one person.Subcategories are:ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY, LIMITED CAPACITY: A Type I or Type II assisted living facility having two to five residents.ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY, SMALL: A Type I or Type II assisted living facility having six to sixteen residents.ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY, LARGE: A Type I or Type II assisted living facility having more than sixteen residents."(d)In IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202, General Definitions, the definition for Child Care Facilitychild care facility is added as follows: "CHILD CARE FACILITY: A facility where care and supervision is provided for four or more children for less than 24 hours a day and for direct or indirect compensation in place of care ordinarily provided in their home."(e)In IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202, General Definitions, the definition for Independent Third-Partyindependent third-party is added as follows: "INDEPENDENT THIRD-PARTY. An engineer or architect licensed in the State of Utah, who is not affiliated with the jurisdiction or the project owner, developer, architect, or engineer, and is agreeable to all parties. The independent third-party will provide unbiased assessments, opinions, or services based on their expertise and professional standards in their respective fields."(f)IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202203.4.2, General Definitions, OCCUPANCY CLASSIFICATION, Educational Group E, Group E, day care facilities, is deleted and replaced with the following:"Group E, Child Care Facilities203.4.2 Group E, day care facilities. This group includes buildings and structures or portions thereof occupied by four or more children 2 years of age or older who receive educational, supervision, child care services or personal care services for fewer than 24 hours per day. See Section 429, Day Care, for special requirements for day care.203.4.2.1 Within Places of Religious Worship. Rooms and spaces within places of religious worship providing such day care during religious functions shall be classified as part of the primary occupancy.203.4.2.2 Four or Fewer Children. A facility having four or fewer children receiving such day care shall be classified as part of the primary occupancy.203.4.2.3 Four or Fewer Children in a Dwelling Unit. A facility such as the above within a dwelling unit and having four or fewer children receiving such day care shall be classified as a Group R-3 occupancy or shall comply with the International Residential Code.203.4.2.4 Child Day Care - Residential Child Care Certificate or a License. Areas used for child day care purposes with a residential child care certificate, as described in Utah Administrative Code, R430-50, Residential Certificate Child Care, or a residential child care license, as described in Utah Administrative Code, R430-90, Licensed Family Child Care, may be located in a Group R-2 or R-3 occupancy as provided in the International Building Code, Sections 310.3 and 310.4, or shall comply with the International Residential Code, Section R101.2.203.4.2.5 Child Care Centers. Each of the following areas may be classified as accessory occupancies, if the area complies with the International Building Code, Section 508.2:1.  Hourly child care center, as described in Utah Administrative Code, R381-60, Hourly Child Care Centers;2.  Child care centers, as described in Utah Administrative Code, R381-100, Child Care Centers;3.  Out-of-school-timeOut-of-School-Time programs, as described in Utah Administrative Code, R381-70, Out of School TimeOut-of-School-Time Child Care Programs; and4.  Commercial preschools, as described in Utah Administrative Code, R381-40, Commercial Preschool Programs."(g)In IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202203.7.1, General Definitions, OCCUPANCY CLASSIFICATION, Institutional Group I-1, is amended as follows: In the list of items under "This group shall include," the words "Type-I Large and Type-II Small, see the International Building Code, Section 308.2.5308.2" are added after "Assisted living facilities."(h)In IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202203.7.1.4, General Definitions, OCCUPANCY CLASSIFICATION, Institutional Group I-1, Five or fewer persons receiving custodial care is amended as follows: On line four after "International Residential Code" the rest of the section is deleted.rewritten as follows:"A facility with five or fewer persons receiving custodial care shall be classified as Group R-3 or shall comply with the International Residential Code."(i)IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202203.7.2, General Definitions, OCCUPANCY CLASSIFICATION, Institutional Group I-2, is deleted and replaced with the following:"Institutional Group I-2. Institutional Group I-2 occupancy shall include buildings and structures used for medical care on a 24-hour basis for more than four persons who are incapable of self-preservation. This group shall include, but not be limited to the following:Assisted living facilities, Type-II Large, see Section 308.3.3Child care facilitiesFoster care facilitiesDetoxification facilitiesHospitalsNursing homes (both intermediate care facilities and skilled nursing facilities)Psychiatric hospitals."(j)In IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202203.7.2, General Definitions, OCCUPANCY CLASSIFICATION, Institutional Group I-2, a new section is added as follows:"203.7.2.3 Assisted Living Facilities. A Type I, Large assisted living facility is classified as occupancy Group I-1, Condition 1. A Type II, Small assisted living facility is classified as occupancy Group I-1, Condition 2. See Section 202 for definitions."(k)IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202203.7.4.1, General Definitions, OCCUPANCY CLASSIFICATION, Institutional Group I-4, day care facilities, Classification as Group E, Five or fewer persons receiving care, and Five or fewer occupants receiving care in a dwelling unit are is deleted and replaced with the following:"203.7.4.1 Classification as Group E. A child day care facility that provides care for five or more but not more than 100 children under two years of age, where the rooms in which the children are cared for are located on a level of exit discharge serving such rooms and each of these child care rooms has an exit door directly to the exterior, shall be classified as a Group E. See the International Building Code, Section 429 for special requirements for Day Care."(l)IFC, Chapter 2, Section 203.7.4.3, Five or fewer persons receiving care, is deleted and rewritten as follows: Four"203.7.4.3 Four or Fewer Persons Receiving Care. A facility having four or fewer persons receiving custodial care shall be classified as part of the primary occupancy. See the International Building Code, Section 429, for special requirements for Day Care."(m)IFC, Chapter 2, Section 203.7.4.4, Five or fewer persons receiving care in a dwelling unit, is deleted and rewritten as follows: Four"203.7.4.4 Four or Fewer Persons Receiving Care in a Dwelling Unit. A facility such as the above within a dwelling unit and having four or fewer persons receiving custodial care shall be classified as a Group R-3 occupancy or shall comply with the International Residential Code. See the International Building Code, Section 429, for special requirements for Day Care."(l)(n)IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202203.9.3, General Definitions, OCCUPANCY CLASSIFICATION, Residential Group R-3, is deleted and replaced with the following:"203.9.3 Residential Group R-3. Residential Group R-3 occupancies and single family dwellings complying with the International Residential Code where the occupants are primarily permanent in nature and not classified as Group R-1, R-2, R-4, or I occupancies, including:Assisted Living Facilities, Type-I, limited capacity, see Section 310.5.3Buildings that do not contain more than two dwellingsCare facilities, other than child care, that provide accommodations for five or fewer persons receiving careCongregate living facilities (nontransient) with 16 or fewer occupantsBoarding houses (nontransient)ConventsDormitoriesFraternities and sororitiesMonasteriesCongregate living facilities (transient) with 10 or fewer occupantsBoarding houses (transient)Lodging houses (transient) with five or fewer guest rooms and 10 or fewer occupants."(m)(o)IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202, General Definitions, OCCUPANCY CLASSIFICATION203.9.3.1, Residential Group R-3, Care facilities within a dwelling, is deleted and replaced with the following: "203.9.3.1 Care Facilities within a Dwelling. Care facilities, other than child care, for five or fewer persons receiving care that are within a single family dwelling are permitted to comply with the International Residential Code. See the International Building Code, Section 429, for special requirements for Child Day Care."(n)(p)In IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202, General Definitions, OCCUPANCY CLASSIFICATION203.9.3, Residential Group R-3, a new section is added as follows: "203.9.3.3 Child Care. Areas used for child care purposes may be located in a residential dwelling unit when all of the following conditions are met:1.  Compliance with Utah Administrative Code, R710-8, Day Care Rules, as enacted under the authority of the Utah Fire Prevention Board;2.  Use is approved by the Department of Health and Human Services under the authority of Utah Code, Title 26B, Chapter 2, Part 4, Child Care Licensing, and in any of the following categories:1.1.  Utah Administrative Code, R430-50, Residential Certificate Child Care; or1.2.  Utah Administrative Code, R430-90, Licensed Family Child Care; and1.3  Compliance with all zoning regulations of the local regulator."(o)(q)In IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202, General Definitions, OCCUPANCY CLASSIFICATION203.9.3, Residential Group R-3, a new section is added as follows:"203.9.3.4 Assisted Living Facilities. Type I assisted living facilities with two to five residents are Limited Capacity facilities classified as a Residential Group R-3 occupancy or are permitted to comply with the International Residential Code. See Section 202 for definitions."(p)(r)In IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202, General Definitions, OCCUPANCY CLASSIFICATION203.9.4, Residential Group R-4, the words "Type II Limited Capacity and Type I Small, see R-4 Assisted Living Facility Occupancy Groups" are added after the words "Assisted Living Facilitiesliving facilities."(q)(s)In IFC, Chapter 2, Section 202, General Definitions, OCCUPANCY CLASSIFICATION203.9.4, Residential Group R-4, a new section is added as follows:  "203.9.4.3 Group R-4 - Assisted Living Facility Occupancy Groups. The following occupancy groups shall apply to Assisted Living Facilities:Type II Assisted Living Facilities with two to five residents are Limited Capacity Facilities classified as a Residential Group R-4, Condition 2 occupancy.Type I assisted living facilities with six to sixteen residents are Small Facilities classified as Residential Group R-4, Condition 1 occupancies. See Section 202 for definitions."

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 15A-5-202.5 is amended to read:15A-5-202.5. Amendments and additions to Chapters 3 and 4 of IFC.(1)For IFC, Chapter 3, General Requirements:(a)IFC, Chapter 3, Section 304.1.2304.1.3, Vegetation, is amended as follows: Delete line six and replace it with: "Utah Administrative Code, R652-122-1300, Minimum Standards for County Wildland Fire Ordinance".."(b)IFC, Chapter 3, Section 310.8, Hazardous environmental conditions, is deleted and rewritten as follows:  "1. When the fire code official determines that existing or historical hazardous environmental conditions necessitate controlled use of any ignition source, including fireworks, lighters, matches, sky lanterns, and smoking materials, any of the following may occur:1.1.  If the existing or historical hazardous environmental conditions exist in a municipality, the legislative body of the municipality may prohibit the ignition or use of an ignition source in:1.1.1.  mountainous, brush-covered, forest-covered, or dry grass-covered areas;1.1.2.  within 200 feet of waterways, trails, canyons, washes, ravines, or similar areas;1.1.3.  the wildland urban interface area, which means the line, area, or zone where structures or other human development meet or intermingle with undeveloped wildland or land being used for an agricultural purpose; or1.1.4.  a limited area outside the hazardous areas described in this paragraph 1.1 to facilitate a readily identifiable closed area, in accordance with paragraph 2.1.2.  If the existing or historical hazardous environmental conditions exist in an unincorporated area, the state forester may prohibit the ignition or use of an ignition source in all or part of the areas described in paragraph 1.1 that are within the unincorporated area, after consulting with the county fire code official who has jurisdiction over that area.2.  If a municipal legislative body or the state forester closes an area to the discharge of fireworks under paragraph 1, the legislative body or state forester shall:2.1.  designate the closed area along readily identifiable features like major roadways, waterways, or geographic features;2.2.  ensure that the boundary of the designated closed area is as close as is practical to the defined hazardous area, provided that the closed area may include areas outside of the hazardous area to facilitate a readily identifiable line; and2.3.  identify the closed area through a written description or map that is readily available to the public.3.  A municipal legislative body or the state forester may close a defined area to the discharge of fireworks due to a historical hazardous environmental condition under paragraph 1 if the legislative body or state forester:3.1.  makes a finding that the historical hazardous environmental condition has existed in the defined area before July 1 of at least two of the preceding five years;3.2.  produces a map indicating the boundaries, in accordance with paragraph 2, of the defined area described; and3.3.  before May 1 of each year the defined area is closed, provides the map described in paragraph 3.2 to the county in which the defined area is located.4.  A municipal legislative body or the state forester may not close an area to the discharge of fireworks due to a historical hazardous environmental condition unless the legislative body or state forester provides a map, in accordance with paragraph 3."(c)IFC, Chapter 3, Section 311.1.1, Abandoned premises, is amended as follows: On line 10 delete the words "International Property Maintenance Code and the".."(d)IFC, Chapter 3, Section 311.5, Placards, is amended as follows: On line three delete the word "shall" and replace it with the word "may".."(2)IFC, Chapter 4, Emergency Planning and Preparedness:(a)In IFC, Chapter 4, the following new Sections are added:"401.3.1.1  Special Education Classrooms. Special education classrooms may shelter in place, or delay evacuation when all of the following conditions are met:401.3.1.1.1  There is no visible flame or evidence of products of combustion (smoke).401.3.1.1.2  The building is completely protected by an approved fire sprinkler system.401.3.1.1.3 The building is completely protected by an approved fire alarm system.401.3.1.1.4  The classroom has a minimum of one approved exit that discharges directly to the exterior.401.3.1.1.5  The classroom has been approved to shelter in place by the fire code official."(b)(a)In IFC, Chapter 4, Section 401.3.3, Delayed notification, a new exception is added:"Exception: Group E Occupancies. Teachers may delay evacuation upon fire alarm activation for up to 60 seconds when all of the following conditions are met:A. There is no visible flame or evidence of products of combustion (smoke).B. The building is protected throughout by an approved fire sprinkler system.C. The building is protected throughout by an approved fire alarm system.D. Students are in the safe zone of the room lined up and prepared for immediate evacuation."(c)(b)IFC, Chapter 4, Section 403.9.2.1, College and university buildings, is deleted and replaced with the following:"403.9.2.1 College and university buildings and fraternity and sorority houses.(i)College and university buildings, including fraternity and sorority houses, shall prepare an approved fire safety and evacuation plan, in accordance with Section 404.(ii)Group R-2 college and university buildings, including fraternity and sorority houses, shall comply with Sections 403.9.2.1.1 and 403.9.2.1.2."(c)In IFC, Chapter 4, the following new sections are added:"403.4.4 Special Education Classrooms. Special education classrooms may shelter in place, or delay evacuation when all of the following conditions are met:403.4.4.1  There is no visible flame or evidence of products of combustion (smoke).403.4.4.2  The building is completely protected by an approved fire sprinkler system.403.4.4.3 The building is completely protected by an approved fire alarm system.403.4.4.4  The classroom has a minimum of one approved exit that discharges directly to the exterior.403.4.4.5  The classroom has been approved to shelter in place by the fire code official."(d)IFC, Chapter 4, Section 405.3, Table 405.3, is amended to add the following footnotes:(i)"cd.  Secondary schools in Group E occupancies shall have an emergency evacuation drill conducted at least every two months, to a total of four emergency evacuation drills during the nine-month school year. The first emergency evacuation drill shall be conducted within 10 school days after the beginning of classes. The third emergency evacuation drill, weather permitting, shall be conducted 10 school days after the beginning of the next calendar year. The second and fourth emergency evacuation drills may be substituted by a security or safety drill to include shelter in place, earthquake drill, or lock down for violence. If inclement weather causes a secondary school to miss the 10-day deadline for the third emergency evacuation drill, the secondary school shall perform the third emergency evacuation drill as soon as practicable after the missed deadline."(ii)"de.  In Group E occupancies, excluding secondary schools, if the AHJ approves, the monthly required emergency evacuation drill can be substituted by a security or safety drill to include shelter in place, earthquake drill, or lock down for violence. The routine emergency evacuation drill must be conducted at least every other drill."(iii)"ef.  A-3 occupancies in academic buildings of institutions of higher learning are required to have one emergency evacuation drill per year, provided the following conditions are met:(A)(A)  The building has a fire alarm system in accordance with Section 907.2.(B)(B)   The rooms classified as assembly shall have fire safety floor plans as required in Subsection 404.2.2(4) posted.(C)  (C)  The building is not classified a high-rise building.(D)  (D)  The building does not contain hazardous materials over the allowable quantities by code."

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 15A-5-203 is amended to read:15A-5-203. Amendments and additions to IFC related to fire safety, building, and site requirements.(1)For IFC, Chapter 5, Fire Service Features:(a)In IFC, Chapter 5, a new Section 501.5, Access grade and fire flow, is added as follows:  "An authority having jurisdiction over a structure built in accordance with the requirements of the International Residential Code as adopted in the State Construction Code, may require an automatic fire sprinkler system for the structure only by ordinance and only if any of the following conditions exist:(i)the structure:(A)is located in an urban-wildland interface area as provided in the Utah Wildland Urban Interface Code adopted as a construction code under the State Construction Code; and(B)does not meet the requirements described in Utah Code, Subsection 65A-8-203(4)(f) and Utah Administrative Code, R652-122-1300, Minimum Standards for County Wildland Fire Ordinance;(ii)the structure is in an area where a public water distribution system with fire hydrants does not exist as required in Utah Administrative Code, R309-550-5, Water Main Design;(iii)the only fire apparatus access road has a grade greater than 10% for more than 500 continual feet;(iv)the total floor area of all floor levels within the exterior walls of the dwelling unit exceeds 10,000 square feet; or(v)the total floor area of all floor levels within the exterior walls of the dwelling unit is double the average of the total floor area of all floor levels of unsprinkledunsprinklered homes in the subdivision that are no larger than 10,000 square feet.(vi)Exception: A single family dwelling does not require a fire sprinkler system if the dwelling:(A)is located outside the wildland urban interface;(B)is built in a one-lot subdivision; and(C)has 50 feet of defensible space on all sides that limits the propensity of fire spreading from the dwelling to another property."(b)In IFC, Chapter 5, Section 503.4.1, is deleted. (c)In IFC, Chapter 5, Section 506.1, Where Required, is deleted and rewritten as follows:  "Where access to or within a structure or an area is restricted because of secured openings or where immediate access is necessary for life-saving or fire-fighting purposes, the fire code official, after consultation with the building owner, may require a key box to be installed in an approved location. The key box shall contain keys to gain necessary access as required by the fire code official. For each fire jurisdiction that has at least one building with a required key box, the fire jurisdiction shall adopt an ordinance, resolution, or other operating rule or policy that creates a process to ensure that each key to each key box is properly accounted for and secure."(c)(d)In IFC, Chapter 5, a new Section 507.1.1, Isolated one- and two-family dwellings, is added as follows:  "Fire flow may be reduced for an isolated one- and two-family dwelling when the authority having jurisdiction over the dwelling determines that the development of a full fire-flow requirement is impractical."(d)(e)In IFC, Chapter 5, a new Section 507.1.2, Pre-existing subdivision lots, is added as follows:"507.1.2  Pre-existing subdivision lots.The requirements for a pre-existing subdivision lot shall not exceed the requirements described in Section 501.5."(e)(f)In IFC, Chapter 5, Section 507.5.1, here required, a new exception is added as follows: "3. One interior and one detached accessory dwelling unit on a single residential lot."(f)(g)(i)IFC, Chapter 5, Section 510.1, Emergency responder communication coverage in new buildings, is amended by adding: "When required by the fire code official, unless the new building is a public school as that term is defined in Section 53G-9-205.1 or a private school, if determined by the fire code official to be necessary after construction of the new building is completed, then the fire code official shall require," at the beginning of the first paragraph.(ii)"For public and private schools, an initial radio coverage test must be conducted by a qualified professional using appropriate testing equipment, and a report of the results must be submitted to the fire code official. Subsequent routine testing may be conducted by the fire code official using basic equipment. The fire code official may require additional professional testing if routine testing indicates potential issues with radio coverage."(2)For IFC, Chapter 6, Building Services and Systems:(a)IFC, Chapter 6, Section 604.6.1, Elevator key location, is deleted and rewritten as follows: "Firefighter service keys shall be kept in a "Supra-Stor-a-key" elevator key box or similar box with corresponding key system that is adjacent to the elevator for immediate use by the fire department. The key box shall contain one key for each elevator, one key for lobby control, and any other keys necessary for emergency service. The elevator key box shall be accessed using a 6049 numbered key."(b)IFC, Chapter 6, Section 606.1, General, is amended as follows: On line three, after the word "Code", add the words "and NFPA 96".."(c)IFC, Chapter 6, Section 607.2606.2, a new exceptionException 5 is added as follows:  "5. A Type 1 hood is not required for a cooking appliance in a microenterprise home kitchen, as that term is defined in Utah Code, Section 26B-7-401, for which the operator obtains a permit in accordance with Section 26B-7-416."(3)IFC, Chapter 7, Fire and Smoke Protection Features, Section 702.5, is deleted.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 15A-5-204 is amended to read:15A-5-204. Amendments and additions to IFC related to fire protection and life safety systems.For IFC, Chapter 9, Fire Protection and Life Safety Systems:(1)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 901.4.7, Pump and riser room size, is deleted and replaced with the following:"901.4.7 Pump and Riser Room Size.901.4.7.1 Fire pump rooms and automatic sprinkler system riser rooms shall be designed with adequate space for all installed equipment necessary for the installation and to provide sufficient working room around the stationary equipment. Clearances around equipment to elements of permanent construction, including other installed equipment and appliances, shall be sufficient to allow inspection, service, repair or replacement without removing such elements of permanent construction or disabling the function of a required fire-resistance-rated assembly and not less than the following minimum elements:901.4.7.1.1 A minimum clear and unobstructed distance of 12 inches shall be provided from the installed equipment to the elements of permanent construction.901.4.7.1.2 A minimum clear and unobstructed distance of 12 inches shall be provided between all other installed equipment and appliances.901.4.7.1.3 A clear and unobstructed width of 36 inches shall be provided in front of all installed equipment and appliances, to allow for inspection, service, repair or replacement without removing such elements of permanent construction or disabling the function of a required fire resistance-rated assembly.901.4.7.2 Fire Pump Room. Fire pumps and controllers shall be provided with ready access. Fire pump rooms shall be provided with doors and an unobstructed passageway large enough to allow for the removal of the largest piece of equipment. The passageway shall have a clear width not less than 72 inches. Openings into the room shall be clear and unobstructed, with doors swinging in the outward direction from the fire pump room and the opening providing a clear width of not less than 68 inches and a clear height of the door opening shall not be less than 80 inches. The door shall be permitted to be locked provided that the key is available at all times and located in a Key Box in accordance with IFC, Section 506.901.4.7.3 Automatic Sprinkler Riser Room. Automatic sprinkler system risers shall be provided with ready access. Automatic sprinkler system riser rooms shall be provided with doors and an unobstructed passageway large enough to allow for the removal of the largest piece of equipment. The passageway shall have a clear width not less than 36 inches. Openings into the room shall be clear and unobstructed, with doors swinging in the outward direction from the riser room and the opening providing a clear width of not less than 32 inches and a clear height of the door opening shall not be less than 80 inches. The door shall be permitted to be locked provided that the key is available at all times and located in a Key Box in accordance with IFC, Section 506.901.4.7.4 Marking on Access Doors. Access doors for automatic sprinkler system riser rooms and fire pump rooms shall be labeled with an approved sign. The lettering shall be in contrasting color to the background. Letters shall have a minimum height of 2 inches (51 mm) with a minimum stroke of 3/8 inch (10 mm).901.4.7.5 Environment. Automatic sprinkler system riser rooms and fire pump rooms shall be maintained at a temperature of not less than 40 degrees F (4 degrees C). Heating units shall be permanently installed.902.6 Lighting. Permanently installed artificial illumination shall be provided in the automatic sprinkler system riser rooms and fire pump rooms."(2)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 903.2.1.2, Group A-2, is amended to add the following subsection:  "4. An automatic fire sprinkler system shall be provided throughout Group A-2 occupancies where indoor pyrotechnics are used."(3)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 903.2.2, Ambulatory care facilities, is amended as follows:  On line two deleteDelete the words "entire floor" and replace with the word "building" and delete the last paragraph.(4)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 903.2.4, Group F-1, Subsection 2, is deleted and rewritten as follows:  "A Group F-1 fire area is located more than three stories above the lowest level of fire department vehicle access."(5)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 903.2.7, Group M, Subsection 2, is deleted and rewritten as follows:  "A Group M fire area is located more than three stories above the lowest level of fire department vehicle access."(6)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 903.2.8 Group R, including all subsections, is deleted and rewritten as follows:"903.2.8 Group R.An automatic sprinkler system installed in accordance with Section 903.3 shall be proved throughout all buildings with a Group R fire area.Exceptions:1.  Detached one- and two-family dwellings and multiple single-family dwellings (townhouses) constructed in accordance with the International Residential Code for One- and Two-Family Dwellings.2.  Single story Group R-1 occupancies with fire areas not more than 2,000 square feet that contain no installed plumbing or heating, where no cooking occurs, and constructed of Type I-A, I-B, II-A, or II-B construction.3.  Group R-4 fire areas not more than 4,500 gross square feet and not containing more than 16 residents, provided the building is equipped throughout with an approved fire alarm system that is interconnected and receives its primary power from the building wiring and a commercial power system."(7)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 903.2.9, Group S-1, Subsection 2, is deleted and rewritten as follows:  "A Group S-1 fire area is located more than three stories above the lowest level of fire department vehicle access."(8)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 903.3.1.2, NFPA 13R sprinkler systems, Subsections 2 and 3, are deleted and rewritten as follows:"2. The floor level of the highest story is 40 feet (12192 mm) or less above the lowest level of fire department vehicle access.3. The floor level of the lowest story is 40 feet (12192 mm) or less below the lowest level of fire department vehicle access."(9)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 903.3.1.2.3, Attics, is amended by adding the following:  "Exception: Sprinkler protection in attics is not required in buildings that are not required to be sprinklered by another section of this code."(10)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 903.3.5, Water supplies, is amended as follows:  On line six, after the word "Code", add "and as amended in the State Construction Code".."(11)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 903.5, Testing and maintenance, is amended to add the following subsection:  "903.5.1 Tag and Information. A tag shall be attached to the riser indicating the date the antifreeze solution was tested. The tag shall also indicate the type and concentration of antifreeze solution by volume with which the system is filled, the name of the contractor that tested the antifreeze solution, the contractor's license number, and a warning to test the concentration of the antifreeze solutions at yearly intervals."(12)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 904.13.5.2904.14.5.2, Extinguishing system service, is amended to add the following:  "Exception: Automatic fire extinguishing systems located in occupancies where usage is limited and less than six consecutive months may be serviced annually if the annual service is conducted immediately before the period of usage, and approval is received from the AHJ."(13)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 905.3.9, is a new subsection as follows:  "Open Parking Garages. Open parking garages shall be equipped with an approved Class I manual standpipe system when fire department access is not provided for firefighting operations to within 150 feet of all portions of the open parking garage as measured from the approved fire department vehicle access. Class I manual standpipe shall be accessible throughout the parking garage such that all portions of the parking structure are protected within 150 feet of a hose connection.Exception: Open parking garages equipped throughout with an automatic sprinkler system in accordance with Section 903.3.1.1."(14)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 905.12, Existing buildings, is deleted.(15)In IFC, Chapter 9, Section 906.1, Exception 2, is amended as follows:  onOn line three after the word "6," delete the remainder of the paragraph.(16)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 907.2.3, Group E:(a)907.2.3 Group E is deleted and rewritten as follows:  "A manual fire alarm system that initiates the occupant notification signal using an emergency voice/alarm communication system that meets the requirements of Section 907.5.2.2, or a manual fire alarm system that initiates an approved audible and visual occupant notification signal that meets the requirements of Sections 907.5.2.1, 907.5.2.1.1, 907.5.2.1.2, and 907.5.2.3, and is installed in accordance with Section 907.6, and with rules made by the Utah Fire Prevention Board in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, shall be installed in Group E occupancies. Where automatic fire sprinkler systems or smoke detectors are installed, the fire sprinkler systems and smoke detectors shall be connected to the building fire alarm system."(b)Exception 2, delete entirelyis deleted and the remaining exceptions are renumbered.(c)Exception number 4.2, is deleted and rewritten as follows:  "The fire alarm system will activate on sprinkler water flow."(d)New Sections 907.2.3.1 through 907.2.3.7 are added as follows:"907.2.3.1 Automatic detection devices that detect smoke shall be installed throughout all corridors and spaces open to the corridor at the maximum prescribed spacing of thirty feet on center and no more than fifteen feet from the walls or smoke detectors shall be installed as required in NFPA, Standard 72, Section 17.7.907.2.3.2 Where structures are not protected or are partially protected with an automatic fire sprinkler system, approved automatic smoke detectors shall be installed in accordance with the complete coverage requirements of NFPA, Standard 72.907.2.3.3 An approved key plan drawing and operating instructions shall be posted at the main fire alarm panel which displays the location of all alarm zones and if applicable, device addresses.907.2.3.4 The main panel shall be located in a normally attended area such as the main office or lobby. Location of the Main Panel other than as stated above, shall require the review and authorization of the State Fire Marshal Division. Where location as required above is not possible, an electronically supervised remote annunciator from the main panel shall be located in a supervised area of the building. The remote annunciator shall visually indicate system power status, alarms for each zone, and give both visual and audible indication of trouble conditions in the system. All indicators on both the main panel and remote annunciator shall be adequately labeled.907.2.3.5 All system wiring shall be as follows:(A) The initiating device circuits shall be designated and installed Class A as defined in NFPA Standard 72.(B) The notification appliance circuits shall be designated, and installed Class A as defined in NFPA Standard 72.(C) Signaling line circuits shall be designated and installed Class A loop as defined in NFPA Standard 72.907.2.3.6 Fan Shutdown shall be as follows:(A) Fan shut down shall be as required in the International Mechanical Code, Chapter 6, Section 606.(B) Duct detectors required by the International Mechanical Code shall be interconnected and compatible with the fire alarm system."(17)In IFC, Chapter 9, a new Section 907.5.2.3.4, is added as follows:  "907.5.2.3.4 Special Education Classrooms. Visible and audible alarm notification appliances in Special Education classrooms may be replaced with a solid red light when approved by the fire code official."(18)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 907.8, Inspection, testing, and maintenance, is amended to add the following sentences at the end of the section:  "Increases in nuisance alarms shall require the fire alarm system to be tested for sensitivity. Fire alarm systems that continue after sensitivity testing with unwarranted nuisance alarms shall be replaced as directed by the AHJ."(19)IFC, Chapter 9, Section 915.2.3, Group E occupancies and Exception, is deleted and replaced with the following:"915.2.3 Group E Occupancies. Carbon monoxide detectors shall be installed in the following areas within Group E occupancies:(1) Boiler rooms, furnace rooms, and similar rooms, or in adjacent areas where carbon monoxide is likely to spread. (The installation of carbon monoxide detectors in boiler rooms and furnace rooms may cause a false alarm problem. Locating these detectors in adjacent spaces where the carbon monoxide is likely to spread may be a better option.)(2) Home economics rooms with gas appliances.(3) School kitchens with gas appliances. (Commercial kitchens).(4) Arts rooms and other areas with a gas kiln or open flame.(5) Gas roof top units, and other carbon monoxide producing HVAC units, one per zone. (The zone shall be the area covered by the HVAC unit.)(6) In areas with gas wall units.(7) In areas with a gas water heater or boiler.(8) Areas with a forge or foundry.(9) Metal shop or auto shop areas or in adjacent areas where carbon monoxide is likely to spread. (The installation of carbon monoxide detectors in metal shop or auto shop areas may cause a false alarm problem. Locating these detectors in adjacent spaces, i.e. class rooms or corridors, where the carbon monoxide is likely to spread from these spaces may be a better option.)(10) Labs with open flame.(11) HVAC units drawing outside air that could be contaminated with carbon monoxide.(12) Other areas with an open flame or fuel fired appliance.(F) 915.2.3.1 Carbon monoxide alarm signals shall be automatically transmitted to an onsite location that is staffed by school personnel.Exception: Carbon monoxide alarm signals shall not be required to be automatically transmitted to an onsite location that is staffed by school personnel in Group E occupancies with an occupant load of 30 or less."(20)In IFC, Chapter 9, a new Section 915.7, is added as follows:"915.7 Carbon Monoxide Systems in Group E Occupancies. Carbon monoxide systems may be part of a fire alarm system or standalone system.915.7.1 Power and Wiring.915.7.1.1 Power. Carbon monoxide detection systems shall require a primary and secondary power source.915.7.1.2 Wiring. Class "A" wiring is required when the carbon monoxide system is part of, or connected to, a fire alarm system. Standalone carbon monoxide detection systems may use Class "B" wiring. All wiring shall be Class "A" or "B".."915.7.2 Equipment Shut Down. Equipment and appliances that are producing carbon monoxide shall shut down automatically in the zone involved upon carbon monoxide system activation.915.7.3 Notification.915.7.3.1 Local Alarm. Each occupied space shall sound an audible alarm when detecting carbon monoxide at a level in excess of 70 ppm for one hour.915.7.3.2 General Alarm. A blue strobe, visual alarm, is required in a normally occupied location, similar to the administrative offices, when carbon monoxide is detected in the facility in excess of 70 ppm for one hour.915.7.3.2.1 The general alarm shall require a manual reset following an alarm activation.915.7.3.3 Digital Notification. Portable carbon monoxide detectors, with digital read out indicating parts per million of carbon monoxide, in a space to determine the level of hazard in a given space.915.7.4 Monitoring. System monitoring is not required. If the system is monitored, the signal should be a supervisory signal indicating carbon monoxide.915.7.5 Inspection.915.7.5.1 The carbon monoxide detection system shall be tested in the presence of a Deputy or Special Deputy of the State Fire Marshal Division. The Deputy shall require "spot testing" of the system and its components.915.7.5.2 Before requesting final inspection and approval, the installing contractor shall test each component of the system and issue a statement of compliance, in writing, to the State Fire Marshal Division that the carbon monoxide detection system has been installed in accordance with approved plans and has been tested in accordance with the manufacturer's specifications, and the appropriate installation standard.915.7.5.3 Systems shall be tagged with the State approved tag for fire alarm systems, upon final approval and shall be inspected and tagged annually by an individual certified as a Master Fire Alarm Technician, by the State Fire Marshal Division.915.7.6 Evacuation. The affected area within Group E Occupancies shall be evacuated when carbon monoxide is detected at a level in excess of 70 ppm for one hour in that area."

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 15A-5-205 is amended to read:15A-5-205. Amendments and additions to IFC related to means of egress and special processes and uses.(1)IFC, Chapter 10, Section 1010.2.12.1, Delayed egress locking system, Item 9 is added after the existing Item 8 as follows: "9. The secure area or unit with delayed egress locks shall be located at the level of exit discharge in Type V construction."(2)IFC, Chapter 10, Section 1010.2.141010.2.13, Controlled egress doors in Groups I-1 and I-2, after existing Item 8 add Item 9 as follows:  "9. The secure area or unit with special egress locks shall be located at the level of exit discharge in Type V construction."(2)IFC, Chapter 10, Section 1010.2.13.1, Delayed egress locking system, Item 9 is added after the existing Item 8 as follows: "9. The secure area or unit with delayed egress locks shall be located at the level of exit discharge in Type V construction."(3)IFC, Chapter 10, Section [BE] 1011.5.2, Riser height and tread depth, Exception 3, is deleted and replaced with the following:  "3. In Group R-3 occupancies, within dwelling units in Group R-2 occupancies, and in Group U occupancies that are accessory to a Group R-3 occupancy, or accessory to individual dwelling units in Group R-2 occupancies, the maximum riser height shall be 8 inches (203 mm) and the minimum tread depth shall be 9 inches (229 mm). The minimum winder tread depth at the walk line shall be 10 inches (254 mm), and the minimum winder tread depth shall be 6 inches (152 mm). A nosing not less than 0.75 inch (19.1 mm) but not more than 1.25 inches (32 mm) shall be provided on stairways with solid risers where the tread depth is less than 10 inches (254 mm)."(4)IFC, Chapter 10, Section [BE] 1011.11, Handrails, is amended to add the following exception:  " 6. In occupancies in Group R-3, as applicable in Section 1014 and in occupancies in Group U, which are accessory to an occupancy in Group R-3, as applicable in Section 1014, handrails shall be provided on at least one side of stairways consisting of four or more risers."(5)IFC, Chapter 10, Section 1032.2.1, Security devices and egress locks, is amended to add the following:  On line three, after the word "fire",," add the words "and building."

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 15A-5-205.5 is amended to read:15A-5-205.5. Amendments to Chapters 11 and 12 of IFC.(1)For IFC, Chapter 11, Construction Requirements for Existing Buildings:(a)IFC, Chapter 11, Section 1103.2, Emergency Responder Communication Coverage in Existing Buildings, is amended as follows: On on line two after the title, the following is added: "When required by the fire code official, unless the existing building is a public school as that term is defined in Section 53G-9-205.1 or a private school, then the fire code official shall require,".(b)IFC, Chapter 11, Section 1103.5.1, Group A-2, is deleted and replaced with the following:"1103.5.1 Group A-2.  An automatic fire sprinkler system shall be provided throughout existing Group A-2 occupancies where indoor pyrotechnics are used."(c)IFC, Chapter 11, Section 1103.6, Standpipes, is deleted.(d)IFC, Chapter 11, 1103.7, Fire Alarm Systems, is deleted and rewritten as follows: "1103.7, Fire Alarm Systems. The following shall have an approved fire alarm system installed in accordance with Utah Administrative Code, R710-4, Buildings Under the Jurisdiction of the Utah Fire Prevention Board:1.  a building with an occupant load of 300 or more persons that is owned or operated by the state;2.  a building with an occupant load of 300 or more persons that is owned or operated by an institution of higher education; and3.  a building with an occupant load of 50 or more persons that is owned or operated by a school district, private school, or charter school.Exception: the requirements of this section do not apply to a building designated as an Institutional Group I (as defined in IFC 202) occupancy."(e)IFC, Chapter 11, 1103.7.1 Group E, 1103.7.2 Group I-1, 1103.7.3 Group I-2, 1103.7.4 Group I-3, 1103.7.5 Group R-1, 1103.7.5.1 Group R-1 hotel and motel manual fire alarm system, 1103.7.5.1.1 Group R-1 hotel and motel automatic smoke detection system, 1103.7.5.2 Group R-1 boarding and rooming houses manual fire alarm system, and 1103.7.5.2.1 Group R-1 boarding and rooming houses automatic smoke detection system, 1103.7.6 Group R-2 are deleted.(f)IFC, Chapter 11, Section 1103.5.4, High-rise buildings, is amended as follows: On line two, delete "not been adopted" and replace with "been adopted."(g)IFC, Chapter 11, Section 1103.9, Carbon monoxide alarmsdetection, is deleted and rewritten as follows:"1103.9 Carbon Monoxide Detection.Existing Groups E, I-1, I-2, I-4, and R occupancies shall be equipped with carbon monoxide detection in accordance with Section 915."(2)For IFC, Chapter 12, Energy Systems:(a)Delete the section title "1205.2.1 Solar photovoltaic systems for Group R-3 buildings" and replace with the section title "1205.2.1 Solar photovoltaic systems for Group R-3 and buildings constructed in accordance with IRC."(b)Section 1205.2.1, Solar photovoltaic systems for Group R-3 buildings, Exception 1 is deleted, Exception 2 is renumbered to 1 and a second exception is added as follows: "2. Reduction in pathways and clear access width are permitted where a rational approach has been used and the reduction is warranted and approved by the Fire Code Official."(c)Section 1205.3.1 Perimeter pathways, and 1205.3.2 Interior pathways, are deleted and rewritten as follows:  "1204.3.1 Perimeter pathways. There shall be a minimum three foot wide (914 mm) clear perimeter around the edges of the roof. The solar installation shall be designed to provide designated pathways. The pathways shall meet the following requirements:1.  The pathway shall be over areas capable of supporting the live load of fire fighters accessing the roof.2.  The centerline axis pathways shall be provided in both axes of the roof. Centerline axis pathways shall run where the roof structure is capable of supporting the live load of fire fighters accessing the roof.3.  Smoke and heat vents required by Section 910.2.1 or 910.2.2 shall be provided with a clear pathway width of not less than three feet (914 mm) to the vents.4.  Access to roof area required by Section 504.3 or 1011.12 shall be provided with a clear pathway width of not less than three feet (914 mm) around access opening and at least three feet (914 mm) clear pathway to parapet or roof edge."(d)Section 1205.3.3, Smoke ventilation, is deleted and rewritten as follows: "1205.3.2, Smoke ventilation. The solar installation shall be designed to meet the following requirements:1.  Arrays shall be no greater than 150 feet (45720 mm) by 150 feet (45720 mm) in distance in either axis in order to create opportunities for fire department smoke ventilation operations.2.  Smoke ventilation options between array sections shall be one of the following:2.1  A pathway six feet (1829 mm) or greater in width.2.2  A pathway three feet (914 mm) or greater in width and bordering roof skylights or smoke and heat vents when required by Section 910.2.1 or Section 910.2.2.2.3  Smoke and heat vents designed for remote operation using devices that can be connected to the vent by mechanical, electrical, or any other suitable means, protected as necessary to remain operable for the design period. Controls for remote operation shall be located in a control panel, clearly identified and located in an approved location.3.  Where gravity-operated dropout smoke and heat vents occur, a pathway three feet (914 mm) or greater in width on not fewer than one side."

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 15A-5-205.6 is amended to read:15A-5-205.6. Amendments and additions to Chapter 33 of IFC.(1)IFC, Chapter 33, Section 3311.1, Required access, is deleted and rewritten as follows:"3311.1 Required access.3311.1.1 Approved vehicle access. Approved vehicle access for fire fighting shall be provided as described in Chapter 5 of this code to all construction or demolition sites.3311.1.2 Fire department connections. Vehicle access shall be provided to within 100 feet of temporary or permanent fire department connections.3311.1.3 Type of access. Vehicle access shall be provided by either temporary or permanent roads.3311.3.1 Temporary road requirements. Temporary roads shall be constructed with a minimum of site specific required structural fill for permanent roads and road base, or other approved material complying with local standards.3311.3.2 Reports. Compaction reports may be required. An engineer's review and certification of a temporary fire department access road is not required.3311.3.3 Local jurisdictions. A local jurisdiction may not require:(a)permanent roads, or asphalt or concrete on temporary roads before final approval of the structure served by the road; or(b)permanent roads, or asphalt and concrete on temporary roads, during construction of the structure served by the road.3311.1.4 Maintenance. Temporary roads shall be maintained until permanent fire apparatus access roads are available.3311.1.5 Time line. Temporary or permanent fire department access roads shall be functional before construction above the foundation begins and before an appreciable amount of combustible construction materials are on site."(2)IFC, Chapter 33, Section 3311.2, Key boxes, is deleted.(3)(1)IFC, Chapter 33, Section 3307.1, Required access, is rewritten as follows:"3307.1 Required access. Approved vehicle access for firefighting shall be provided as described in Chapter 5 of this code to all construction or demolition sites. Vehicle access shall be provided to within 100 feet (30,480 mm) of temporary or permanent fire department connections. Vehicle access shall be provided by either temporary or permanent roads, capable of supporting vehicle loading under all weather conditions."(2)IFC, Chapter 33, Section 3301.1.1, is rewritten as follows:"3307.1.1.1 Temporary road requirements. Temporary roads shall be constructed with a minimum of site specific required structural fill for permanent roads and road base, or other approved material complying with local standards.3307.1.1.2 Reports. Compaction reports may be required. An engineer's review and certification of a temporary fire department access road is not required.3307.1.1.3 Local jurisdictions. If an improvement completion assurance has been posted in accordance with Section 10-9a-604.5, a local jurisdiction may not require permanent roads, or asphalt or concrete on temporary roads, before final approval of the structure served by the road.3307.1.1.4 Maintenance. Temporary roads shall be maintained until permanent fire apparatus access roads are available.3307.1.1.5 Time line. Temporary or permanent fire department access roads shall be functional before construction above the foundation begins and before an appreciable amount of combustible construction materials are on site."(3)Notwithstanding IFC 3311.3.1, a temporary road that meets the requirements of Section 10-20-1001 or 17-79-901, and any local regulation adopted in accordance with Section 10-20-1001 or 17-79-901, may be constructed.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 15A-5-302 is amended to read:15A-5-302. Amendments and additions to NFPA related to National Fire Alarm and Signaling Code.For NFPA 72, National Fire Alarm and Signaling Code, 20192022 edition:(1)NFPA 72, Chapter 10, Section 10.5.1, System Designer, Subsection 10.5.1.3(2), is deleted and rewritten as follows:  "Certification by the National Institute for Certification in Engineering Technologies at level III or IV in Fire Alarm Systems."(2)NFPA 72, Chapter 10, Section 10.5.3, Inspection, Testing, and Service Personnel, Subsection 10.5.3.1, Inspection Personnel, is deleted and rewritten as follows:"Service personnel shall be qualified and experienced in the inspection, testing, and maintenance of fire alarm systems. Qualified personnel shall meet the certification requirements stated in rule made by the Utah Fire Prevention Board in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act."(3)NFPA 72, Chapter 10, Section 10.12, Fire Alarm Signal Deactivation, Subsection 10.12.2, is amended to add the following sentence:  "When approved by the AHJ, the audible notification appliances may be deactivated during the investigation mode to prevent unauthorized reentry into the building."

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 15A-5-304 is amended to read:15A-5-304. Amendments and additions to NFPA related to Automatic Fire Sprinkler Systems.(1)NFPA 13, Installation of Sprinkler Systems, 20192022 edition,. Chapter 16, Section 16.11.2.1, Local Waterflow Alarms, is amended by adding new subsections as follows:(a)NFPA 13, Chapter 16, Section 16.9.11, Floor Control Valve Assemblies, Subsection 16.9.11.5, is deleted and rewritten as follows:"16.9.11.5, System Subdivision - Floor/Zone Control Valves.Individual floor/zone control valves shall be used at the riser at each floor for connections to piping serving floor areas in excess of 5,000 square feet."(b)NFPA 13, Chapter 8, Section 16.11.2.1, Local Waterflow Alarms, is amended by adding a new subsection as follows:"16.11.2.1.1 Single Tenant Occupancies.When a fire alarm system is not required by IFC, Section 907.2, an approved audible/visual waterflow alarm (horn/strobe) shall be provided in the interior of the building, in a normally occupied location, to alert the occupants of the fire sprinkler system activation."(c)NFPA 13, Chapter 8, Section 16.11.2.1, Local Waterflow Alarms, is amended by adding a new subsection as follows:"16.11.2.1.2 Multi-Tenant Occupancies.When a fire alarm system is not required by IFC, Section 907.2, an approved audible/visual waterflow alarm (horn/strobe) shall be provided in the interior of each tenant space, in a normally occupied location, to alert the occupants of the fire sprinkler system activation."(d)NFPA 13, Chapter 8, Section 16.11.2.1, Local Waterflow Alarms, is amended by adding a new subsection as follows:"16.11.2.1.3 Exterior Waterflow Alarm.An approved audible/visual waterflow alarm (horn/strobe) shall be provided on the exterior of the building in a location approved by the AHJ."(2)NFPA 13D, Installation of Sprinkler Systems in One- and Two-Family Dwellings and Manufactured Homes, 20192022 edition.(a)NFPA 13D, Chapter 7, Section 7.6, Alarms, is amended by adding a new subsection as follows:"7.6.1 Exterior Waterflow Alarm.When an alarm initiating device is included, an approved audible/visual waterflow alarm (horn/strobe) shall be provided on the exterior of the building in a location approved by the AHJ."(b)NFPA 13D, Chapter 7, Section 7.6, Alarms, is amended by adding a new subsection as follows:"7.6.2 Interior Alarm.When an alarm initiating device is included, an interior fire alarm notification appliance is also required to sound throughout the dwelling. An approved audible sprinkler flow alarm to alert the occupants of the dwelling in a normally occupied location when the flow switch is activated must be provided."(3)NFPA, Standard 13R, Installation of Sprinkler Systems in Residential Occupancies up to and Including Four Stories in Height, 20192022 edition.(a)NFPA 13R, Chapter 6, Section 6.8, Valves, is amended by adding a new subsection as follows:"6.8.11 Floor/Zone Control Valves.Individual floor/zone control valves shall be used at the riser at each floor for connections to piping serving floor areas in excess of 5,000 square feet or arranged in a manner acceptable to the AHJ."(b)NFPA 13R, Chapter 6, Section 16, Alarms, is amended by adding a new subsection as follows:"6.16.1.1 Local Waterflow Alarms.When a fire alarm system is not required by IFC, Section 907.2, an approved notification appliance indicating waterflow shall be provided in the interior of each residential unit/tenant space, in a normally occupied location, to alert the occupants of the fire sprinkler system activation."(c)NFPA 13R, Chapter 6, Section 16, Alarms, is amended by adding a new subsection as follows:"6.16.1.2 Exterior Waterflow Alarm.An approved audible/visual waterflow alarm (horn/strobe) shall be provided on the exterior of the building in a location approved by the AHJ."(4)NFPA 25, Standard for the Inspection, Testing, and Maintenance of Water-Based Fire Protection Systems, 2020 edition.NFPA 25, Section 5.3.4.4.1, the first line is deleted and replaced with the following:"For system antifreeze installed prior to July 1, 2023, listed antifreeze shall not be required, where all of the following conditions are met:"(5)(4)NFPA 72, National Fire Alarm and Signaling Code, 20192022 edition.NFPA 72, a new Section 18.1.1.1 is added as follows:"The fire code official may modify the requirements of this chapter in areas of educational occupancies used exclusively for special education students."

Section 11:
Section 12.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.